sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Jahanje > Nega konj: Kovaška oprema za konje; Odeje in rjuhe za konje; Čevlji in ščitniki za konje; Konjska krma; Sredstva proti muham in insektom za konje; Maske proti mrčesu za konje; Urejanje konj; Zdravje konj in prva pomoč; Nega konjskih kopit; Oprema za terapijo in okrevanje konj; Priboljški za konje; Vitamini in prehranska dopolnila za konje; Sredstva za odstranjevanje zajedalcev pri konjih
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ratsastus > Hevostenhoito: Kengitystarvikkeet; Hevosen loimet ja peitteet; Hevosen suojat ja pintelit; Hevosen ruoka; Hevosen hyönteiskarkotteet; Hevosen kärpäshuput; Hevosen hoitaminen; Hevosen terveys ja ensiapu; Kavioiden hoito; Hevosen palautumis- ja hoitovarusteet; Hevosen herkut; Hevosen vitamiinit ja lisäravinteet; Hevosen madotuslääkkeet
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Конен спорт > Грижа за коне: Подковачни консумативи; Одеяла и чаршафи за коне; Гамаши и защитни ботуши за коне; Храна за коне; Контрол на конски мухи и насекоми; Маски за коне против мухи; Подстригване на коне; Здраве за коне и първа помощ; Грижа за конски копита; Оборудване за терапия и възстановяване на коне; Лакомства за коне; Витамини и добавки за коне; Препарати за коне срещу паразити
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ιππασία > Φροντίδα αλόγων: Είδη πεταλωτή; Κουβέρτες και σεντόνια για άλογα; Μπότες και περιτυλίγματα ποδιών για άλογα; Τροφή για άλογα; Αντιπαρασιτικά & εντομοαπωθητικά αλόγων; Μάσκες για μύγες για άλογα; Καλλωπισμός αλόγων; Υγεία & πρώτες βοήθειες αλόγων; Φροντίδα οπλών αλόγου; Εξοπλισμός θεραπείας & αποκατάστασης αλόγων; Λιχουδιές για άλογα; Βιταμίνες & συμπληρώματα για άλογα; Αντιπαρασιτικά αλόγων
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Equitazione > Cura dei cavalli: Articoli per maniscalchi; Coperte e lenzuola per cavalli; Stivali e parastinchi da equitazione; Mangime per cavalli; Prodotti contro mosche e insetti per cavalli; Maschere per mosche per cavalli; Strigliatura cavalli; Salute e pronto soccorso per cavalli; Cura degli zoccoli del cavallo; Attrezzatura per terapia e recupero del cavallo; Ricompense per cavalli; Vitamine e supplementi per cavalli; Vermifughi per cavalli
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Jezdectví > Potřeby pro koně: Podkovářské potřeby; Deky a přikrývky na koně; Koňské podkovy a bandáže; Krmivo pro koně; Ochrana koní proti hmyzu; Koňské masky proti hmyzu; Péče o koně; Zdraví a první pomoc pro koně; Péče o kopyta; Terapeutické a regenerační vybavení pro koně; Odměny pro koně; Vitamíny a doplňky stravy pro koně; Odčervovací přípravky pro koně
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Equestre > Cuidados com cavalos: Artigos de ferreiro; Lençóis e cobertores para cavalos; Faixas e botas para cavalos; Alimentação para cavalos; Controlo de moscas e insetos para cavalo; Máscaras antimoscas para cavalos; Escovagem de cavalos; Saúde e primeiros socorros para cavalo; Cuidados com os cascos de cavalo; Equipamento de terapia e recuperação para cavalo; Recompensas para cavalos; Suplementos e vitaminas para cavalos; Vermífugos para cavalos
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 马术用品 > 马匹护理用品: 钉蹄师用品; 马用毛毯/布单; 马护腿/马绑腿; 马饲料; 马匹防蝇和防虫用品; 马蝇防护面具; 马毛梳洗; 马匹健康和急救用品; 马蹄护理用品; 马匹治疗和康复设备; 马零食; 马匹保健维生素/补品; 马驱虫药
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Equestrian > Horse Care: Farrier Supplies; Horse Blankets & Sheets; Horse Boots & Leg Wraps; Horse Feed; Horse Fly & Insect Control; Horse Fly Masks; Horse Grooming; Horse Health & First Aid; Horse Hoof Care; Horse Therapy & Recovery Equipment; Horse Treats; Horse Vitamins & Supplements; Horse Wormers
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 乗馬 > 馬用品: 装蹄用品; 馬用毛布・シーツ; 馬用ブーツ・レッグラップ; 馬用飼料; 馬用ハエ・害虫対策; 馬用フライマスク; 馬用グルーミング用品; 馬の健康・応急手当; 馬用蹄ケア; 馬用セラピー・リカバリー器具; 馬用おやつ; 馬用ビタミン剤・サプリメント; 馬用駆虫薬
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazdectvo > Starostlivosť o kone: Potreby pre kováčov; Prikrývky a plachty na kone; Konské čižmy a návleky na nohy; Krmivo pre kone; Ochrana proti muchám a hmyzu; Masky proti hmyzu; Starostlivosť o kone; Zdravie koní a prvá pomoc; Starostlivosť na kopytá; Vybavenie pre terapiu a regeneráciu koní; Maškrtyy pre kone; Vitamíny a doplnky pre kone; Pasty na odčervenie koní
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Lovaglás > Lógondozás: Patkolókovács-kellékek; Lótakarók és -lepedők; Lóbakancsok és -lábszárvédők; Lótakarmány; Légy- és rovarvédelem lovaknak; Lólégymaszkok; Lóápolás; Lóegészségügy és elsősegély; Pataápolás; Lóterápiás és rehabilitációs felszerelések; Lócsemegék; Lóvitaminok és -kiegészítők; Lóférgekhajtók
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Конный спорт > Товары для ухода за лошадьми: Кузнечные принадлежности для ковки; Попоны для лошадей; Ногавки, колокола и бинты для лошадей; Корм для лошадей; Средства от мух и насекомых для лошадей; Маски для лошадей от насекомых; Уход за лошадьми; Товары для здоровья и первая помощь для лошадей; Средства по уходу за копытами; Оборудование для терапии и восстановления лошадей; Лакомства для лошадей; Витамины и добавки для лошадей; Противогельминтные средства для лошадей
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Equitación > Cuidado de caballos: Suministros para herradores; Mantas y capas para caballos; Botas y vendas para protección de caballos; Pienso para caballos; Control de moscas e insectos para caballos; Máscaras antimoscas para caballos; Acicalamiento de caballos; Salud y primeros auxilios para caballos; Cuidado de cascos de caballos; Equipos de terapia y recuperación para caballos; Golosinas para caballos; Vitaminas y suplementos para caballos; Antihelmínticos para caballos
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Jahanje > Njega konja: Pribor za potkivača; Pokrivači i plahte za konje; Konjske čizme i zavoji za noge; Hrana za konje; Suzbijanje muha i insekata za konje; Maska protiv insekata za konje; Timarenje konja; Zdravlje i prva pomoć za konja; Njega kopita konja; Oprema za terapiju i oporavak konja; Poslastice za konja; Vitamini i dodaci prehrani za konje; Pasta za konje protiv crva
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Reitsportzubehör > Pferdebedarf: Hufschmiedebedarf; Abreitdecken & Weidedecken; Hufglocken & Gamaschen; Pferdefutter; Fliegen- & Insektenschutz für Pferde; Fliegenmasken; Pferdehaarpflege; Pferdegesundheit & Erste Hilfe; Hufpflege für Pferde; Therapie- & Erholungsausrüstung für Pferde; Leckerli für Pferde; Vitamine & Futterergänzungsmittel für Pferde; Wurmkur für Pferde
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Hestesport > Hestepleie: Hovslagerutstyr; Hestetepper og -dekken; Hesteboots og stallbelegg; Hestefôr; Flue- og insektsmiddel for hest; Fluemasker til hest; Hesterøkting; Helse og førstehjelp for hest; Hovpleie for hest; Terapi- og rehabiliteringsutstyr for hest; Hestegodter; Vitaminer og kosttilskudd til hest; Ormmiddel for hest
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Paardensport > Verzorging van paarden: Hoefsmidbenodigdheden; Paardendekens en -kleden; Paardenschoenen en beenkappen; Paardenvoer; Vliegen- en insectenbestrijding voor paarden; Vliegenmaskers voor paarden; Paardenverzorging; Gezondheid en EHBO voor paarden; Hoefverzorging voor paarden; Therapie- en hersteluitrusting voor paarden; Paardensnoepjes; Vitaminen en supplementen voor paarden; Ontwormingsmiddelen voor paarden
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 승마 > 말 관리: 장제사 용품; 말 담요/시트; 말 부츠/다리 보호대; 말 먹이; 말 파리 및 해충 방제; 말 파리 방지 마스크; 말털 손질용품; 말 건강 및 구급용품; 말 발굽 관리; 말 치료 및 회복 장비; 말 간식; 말 비타민/보충제; 말 구충제
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Binicilik > At Bakım Ürünleri: Nalbant malzemeleri; At Battaniye ve Örtüleri; At Nalları ve Bacak Sargıları; At Besleme; At sinek ve böcek kontrolü; At Sinek Maskeleri; At Tımarlama; At sağlığı ve ilk yardım; At toynağı bakımı; At terapi ve rehabilitasyon ekipmanları; At Bakımı; At Vitaminleri ve Takviyeleri; At Wormerleri
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Hästsport > Hästutrustning: Hovslagarutrustning; Hästfiltar och hästtäcken; Hästboots och benlindor; Hästfoder; Flug- och insektsskydd för hästar; Flugmasker; Hästryktning; Hästhälsa och första hjälpen; Hovvård för hästar; Utrustning för hästterapi och återhämtning; Hästgodis; Vitaminer och kosttillskott för hästar; Avmaskningsmedel för hästar
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cưỡi ngựa > Chăm sóc ngựa: Đồ dùng đóng móng ngựa; Chăn và tấm phủ cho ngựa; Băng bảo vệ chân ngựa; Thức ăn cho ngựa; Sản phẩm diệt ruồi & côn trùng cho ngựa; Mặt nạ ngựa; Chải lông ngựa; Sức khỏe & sơ cứu cho ngựa; Sản phẩm chăm sóc móng ngựa; Thiết bị trị liệu & phục hồi cho ngựa; Thức ăn vặt cho ngựa; Vitamin và thực phẩm bổ sung cho ngựa; Xi-ranh tiêm ngựa
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การขี่ม้า > การดูแลม้า: อุปกรณ์สำหรับช่างทำเกือกม้า; ผ้าห่มและผ้าสำหรับม้า; บูทและที่รัดขาสำหรับม้า; อาหารม้า; ผลิตภัณฑ์กำจัดแมลงและแมลงวันสำหรับม้า; หน้ากากป้องกันแมลงของม้า; อุปกรณ์เสริมสวยสำหรับม้า; อุปกรณ์ดูแลสุขภาพและปฐมพยาบาลม้า; อุปกรณ์ดูแลกีบม้า; อุปกรณ์บำบัดและฟื้นฟูม้า; ขนมสำหรับม้า; วิตามินและอาหารเสริมสำหรับม้า; ยาถ่ายพยาธิสำหรับม้า
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes equestres > Suprimentos para cavalos: Artigos de casqueamento e ferrageamento; Cobertores para cavalos; Proteção para patas e botas para cavalos; Ração para cavalos; Controle de moscas e insetos para cavalo; Máscaras antimoscas para cavalos; Grooming de cavalos; Saúde e primeiros socorros para cavalo; Cuidados com os cascos do cavalo; Equipamentos de terapia e recuperação para cavalo; Petiscos para cavalos; Suplementos e vitaminas para cavalos; Vermífugos para cavalos
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Jojimo sportas > Žirgų priežiūra: Kalvių reikmenys; Antklodės ir paklodės žirgams; Žirgų kojų apsaugos ir apvijos; Žirgų pašaras; Arklių musių ir vabzdžių kontrolė; Kaukės žirgams nuo musių; Žirgų priežiūra; Arklių sveikata ir pirmoji pagalba; Žirgų kanopų priežiūra; Arklių terapijos ir atsigavimo įranga; Skanėstai žirgams; Vitaminai ir papildai žirgams; Kirmėlių šalinimo priemonės žirgams
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Dressur > Produkter til hestepleje: Beslagsmedsudstyr; Hestedækkener og tæpper; Støvler og benvarmere til heste; Hestefoder; Flue- og insektbekæmpelse til heste; Fluemasker til heste; Hestepleje; Sundhed og førstehjælp til heste; Hovpleje til heste; Terapi- og restitutionsudstyr til heste; Godbidder til heste; Vitaminer og kosttilskud til heste; Ormekure til heste
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Echitație > Îngrijirea cailor: Consumabile pentru potcovărie; Pături și prelate pentru cai; Cizme și bandaje pentru picioare pentru cai; Furaj pentru cai; Produse antimuște și antiinsecte pentru cai; Măști anti-muște pentru cai; Întreținerea cailor; Sănătatea cailor și prim ajutor; Îngrijirea copitelor cailor; Echipamente de terapie și recuperare pentru cai; Recompense pentru cai; Vitamine și suplimente pentru cai; Medicamente pentru viermi
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jeździectwo > Produkty do pielęgnacji koni: Sprzęt kowalski; Derki i koce dla koni; Buty i ocieplacze dla koni; Karma dla koni; Środki przeciw owadom dla koni; Maski dla koni przeciw owadom; Artykuły do pielęgnacji koni; Zdrowie i pierwsza pomoc dla koni; Pielęgnacja kopyt; Sprzęt do terapii i rehabilitacji koni; Przysmaki dla koni; Witaminy i suplementy dla koni; Preparaty dla koni przeciw pasożytom
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 馬術運動 > 馬匹照護用品: 釘蹄用品; 馬用毯; 馬蹄鐵和馬腿保護器; 馬用飼料; 馬匹防蠅防蟲用品; 防蒼蠅面具; 馬梳; 馬匹健康與急救用品; 馬蹄護理; 馬匹治療與恢復設備; 馬用零嘴; 馬用維他命和營養補充品; 馬匹防寄生蟲藥劑
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Équitation > Articles pour chevaux: Matériel de maréchalerie; Couvertures pour chevaux; Guêtres et cloches pour chevaux; Aliments pour chevaux; Produits anti-mouches et anti-insectes pour cheval; Masques anti-mouches pour chevaux; Articles de toilettage pour chevaux; Santé et premiers soins du cheval; Soins des sabots pour cheval; Équipement de thérapie et de récupération pour cheval; Friandises pour chevaux; Vitamines et compléments alimentaires pour chevaux; Vermifuges pour chevaux